Hawaii statutes.
§334-126 Hearing on petition. (a) The
court may adjourn or continue a hearing for failure to timely notify a person
entitled to be notified.

(b) The time and form of the procedure
incident to hearing the issues in the petition shall be provided by family
court rule and consistent with this part.

(c) Hearings may be held at any convenient
place within the circuit. The subject of the petition, any interested party,
or the family court upon its own motion may request a hearing in another court
because of inconvenience to the parties, witnesses, or the family court or
because of the subject's physical or mental condition.

(d) The hearing shall be closed to the public,
unless the subject of the petition requests otherwise.

(e) The subject of the petition shall be
present at the hearing. However, if the subject has been served with the
petition and does not appear at the hearing, the court may appoint a guardian
ad litem to represent the best interests of the subject through the
proceedings.

(f) Notwithstanding chapter 802 to the
contrary, the public defender or other court-appointed counsel shall represent
the subject upon filing of the petition. A copy of the petition shall be
served upon the public defender by the petitioner. The public defender or the
court-appointed counsel may withdraw upon a showing that the subject is not
indigent. If the subject does not desire representation, the court may
discharge the attorney after finding that the subject understands the
proceedings and the relief prayed for in the petition. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to:

(1) Require the subject of the petition to accept
legal representation by the public defender or other court-appointed counsel;
or

(2) Prevent the subject of the petition from obtaining
their own legal counsel to represent them in any proceeding.

(g) If the subject of the petition is
represented by an attorney, the attorney shall be allowed adequate time for
investigation of the matters at issue and for preparation, and shall be
permitted to present the evidence that the attorney believes necessary for a
proper disposition of the proceeding.

(h) No subject of the petition shall be
ordered to receive assisted community treatment unless at least one
psychiatrist testifies in person at the hearing who has personally assessed the
subject, within a reasonable time before the filing of the petition up to the
time when the psychiatrist provides oral testimony at court. The
psychiatrist's testimony shall state the facts which support the allegation
that the subject meets all the criteria for assisted community treatment,
provide a written treatment plan, which shall include non-mental health
treatment if appropriate, provide the rationale for the recommended treatment,
and identify the designated mental health program responsible for the
coordination of care.

If the recommended assisted community treatment
includes medication, the psychiatrist's testimony shall describe the types or
classes of medication which should be authorized, and describe the physical and
mental beneficial and detrimental effects of such medication.

(i) The subject of the petition may secure a
psychiatric examination and present the findings as evidence at the hearing.
The subject shall be entitled to a psychiatric examination at a community
mental health center if the subject so desires, and if an examination has not
already been conducted at a community mental health center which will lead to
psychiatric testimony at the hearing. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c
221, §§12, 24; am L 2015, c 231, §4; am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next